Louisiana, session 2026, HB747.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:1360.53(2) and (4), 1360.55(C), 1360.57, 1360.58, 1360.59(A),
1360.60, 1360.62(A) and (B), and 1360.67(A)(introductory paragraph), (B), and (C) are
hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1360.53. Powers and duties of the board
The board shall have and exercise with respect to medical psychologists all
powers and duties granted to it by R.S. 37:1261 et seq. relative to physicians. In
addition, the board shall have the authority to:
* * *
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 747 ENROLLED
(2) Approve, deny, revoke, suspend, renew, and reinstate licensure or
certification of duly qualified applicants.
* * *
(4) Conduct hearings on charges calling for the denial, suspension,
revocation, or refusal to renew a license or certificate.
* * *
§1360.55. Qualifications of applicants
* * *
C. Any medical psychologist who obtains a medical psychology license
pursuant to this Section shall be is exclusively licensed and regulated by the board
and shall is not be required to maintain a license to practice psychology issued by the
Louisiana Board of Examiners of Psychologists for any purpose, including renewal
of the medical psychology license or to receive a certificate of advanced practice in
accordance with R.S. 37:1360.57. The provisions of this Subsection shall are not be
construed as prohibiting an individual from choosing to maintain dual licensure as
both a medical psychologist and a psychologist. In the event that an individual
chooses to maintain dual licensure as both a medical psychologist and a
psychologist, that individual will be licensed and regulated as a medical psychologist
by the board and will be licensed and regulated as a psychologist by the Louisiana
Board of Examiners of Psychologists.
* * *
§1360.57. Certificate of advanced practice License for advanced practice of medical
psychology
A. A medical psychologist who obtains a medical psychology license in
accordance with R.S. 37:1360.55 and who possesses all of the following additional
qualifications to the satisfaction of the board shall be issued a certificate of advanced
practice license for the advanced practice of medical psychology:
(1) Three years of experience practicing as a medical psychologist.
(2) Treatment of a minimum of one hundred patients involving the use of a
range of psychotropic medications, including but not limited to antipsychotics,
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 747 ENROLLED
antidepressants, psychostimulants, mood stabilizers, anxiolytics, and hypnotics, that
demonstrate the competence of the medical psychologist.
(3) The recommendation of two collaborating physicians, each of whom
holds an unconditional license to practice medicine in Louisiana, and who are each
familiar with the applicant's competence to practice medical psychology.
(4) The recommendation of the Medical Psychology Advisory Committee.
(5) The completion of a minimum of one hundred hours of continuing
medical education relating to the use of medications in the management of patients
with psychiatric illness commencing with the issuance of a license by the board in
accordance with R.S. 37:1360.55.
B. The fee for an initial application and license issued by the board to an
advanced practice medical psychologist shall not exceed three hundred twenty-five
dollars. The renewal of a license for advanced practice of medical psychology shall
not exceed three hundred dollars.
§1360.58. Issuance and renewal of license
A. The board shall issue a license or certificate to any person who meets the
qualifications provided for in this Part and the rules and regulations of the board, and
who pays the respective fees fixed by the board.
B. A license or certificate issued under in accordance with the provisions of
this Part shall be subject to annual renewal and shall expire and become null and
void unless renewed in the manner prescribed by the board.
§1360.59. Designation of license
A. A license or certificate issued under in accordance with this Part shall
designate the licensee's status with respect to advanced practice.
* * *
§1360.60. Reinstatement of license
A. Any license or certificate suspended, revoked, or otherwise restricted by
the board may be reinstated by the board.
B. A license or certificate that has expired without renewal may be reinstated
by the board for a period of two years from the date of expiration, provided if the
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 747 ENROLLED
applicant is otherwise eligible under pursuant to the provisions of this Part, pays the
applicable fees, and satisfies the continuing education and such other requirements
as may be established by the board.
* * *
§1360.62. Standards of practice for medical psychologists holding certificates a
license of advanced practice
A. Patients receiving care from a medical psychologist who holds a
certificate license of advanced practice issued in accordance with this Part shall have
an established primary care provider who shall be responsible for the patient's overall
medical care.
B. The primary care provider shall evaluate the patient for medical
conditions in accordance with customary practice standards and as might be
indicated based on the medications that the patient is receiving and risk factors that
may be present. If the primary care provider refers the patient to a medical
psychologist holding a certificate license of advanced practice for the express
purpose of evaluation and treatment to include drug management, this condition shall
be considered met.
* * *
§1360.67. Causes for refusal to issue, suspension or revocation of licenses, permits,
and certificates licenses and permits
A. The board may refuse to issue, or may suspend or revoke any license or
certificate, license, or impose probationary or other restrictions on any license or
certificate issued under pursuant to this Part for the following causes:
* * *
B. The board may, as a probationary condition, or as a condition of the
reinstatement of any license or certificate suspended or revoked hereunder, require
the license or certificate holder to pay all costs of the board proceedings, including
investigator, stenographer, and attorney fees, and to pay a fine not to exceed five
thousand dollars.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 747 ENROLLED
C. Any license or certificate suspended, revoked, or otherwise restricted by
the board may be reinstated by the board.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 37:1360.61(G)(5) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.